Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 4. Employment of Children.

Administrative Code. —

For child labor, see 8 AAC 05.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Master and Servant, § 154.

51B C.J.S., Labor Relations, § 1021.

Sec. 23.10.325.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of AS

23.10.325

—

23.10.370

to establish protective standards for child labor to the end that their health, morals, education, and future welfare will be protected during the formative years and to the further end that any abuses or unjust exploitation of this labor will be effectively prohibited.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For entertainment industry, see 8 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 23.10.330.
Exempted employment.

AS

23.10.325

—

23.10.370

do not prohibit employment of a child under the direct supervision of a parent in a business owned and operated by the parent or the work of a child on a boat owned and operated by the parent of the child.

Notwithstanding AS

23.10.335

—

23.10.350

, a minor of any age may be employed as a performer in the entertainment industry. The provisions of AS

23.10.335

—

23.10.350

and AS

23.10.360(a)

and

23.10.360(c)

concerning times, hours, or days of work do not apply to the employment of a minor as a performer in the entertainment industry. The department may adopt regulations to implement this subsection. In this subsection, a “performer in the entertainment industry” means a performer in advertisements and television, film, radio, and theater productions but does not include employment on the premises of a business offering any form of adult entertainment under AS

23.10.350(f)

regardless of the nature of the work performed by the minor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For entertainment industry, see 8 AAC 5, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Lawn mowing by minors as violation of child labor statutes. 56 ALR3d 1166.

Sec. 23.10.332.
Authorization for children under 17 to work.

Except for employment exempted under AS

23.10.330

and other employment specifically exempted by regulations adopted by the department, a minor under 17 years of age may not be employed or allowed to work without the written authorization of the commissioner unless authorized under AS

23.10.360

or under (c) of this section.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

An employer may employ a minor who is at least 14 years of age to perform a specific job consisting of listed duties without the written authorization of the commissioner under (a) of this section if the employer has, in advance, secured the approval of the commissioner for a minor to perform that job and the employer files the written consent from the minor’s parent or guardian described in (d) of this section. The employer may not change any of the listed duties of a job to be performed by a minor without prior approval of the commissioner.

A written consent from a parent or guardian filed under (c) of this section

is valid only for the job and listed duties specified on the consent;

must be filed with the commissioner within seven calendar days after the minor begins working the job specified in the consent;

is valid for the calendar year in which it is executed or, in the case of a written consent executed in December, for that calendar year, the next calendar year, or both, depending on the terms of the written consent;

shall be on a form provided by the department; the department may use the same form that it uses to issue work permits under (a) of this section to secure parental signatures under this subsection; and

must be signed by a parent or legal guardian of the minor before the date the minor begins working the job specified in the consent.

History.

(§ 3 ch 112 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 76 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For employment of minors under 18 years of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 23.10.335.
Employment of children under 14.

A minor under 14 years of age may not be employed or allowed to work in an occupation outside school hours except in domestic employment, baby-sitting, and handiwork in and about private homes; newspaper delivery or sales; or canneries in warehouse work casing cans under competent supervision.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.10.340.
Employment of children under 16.

A minor under 16 years of age may not be employed for more than a combined total of nine hours school attendance and employment in one day. If employed, the minor’s work may be performed only between 5 a.m. and 9 p.m. Employment outside school hours may not exceed 23 hours in one week, domestic work and baby-sitting excepted.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 112 SLA 1976.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1949; § 3 ch 73 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 1951; am § 7 ch 112 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1981)

Sec. 23.10.345.
Exemptions for minors over 16 or who have graduated from high school. [Repealed, § 7 ch 112 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 23.10.350.
Employment of person under 18.

A minor under 18 years of age may not be employed or allowed to work

more than six days a week;

in hazardous excavation, or underground in mines, or as hoisting engineer in mines; or

in an occupation dangerous to life or limb or injurious to the health of the minor.

If the commissioner determines that the duties to be performed by the minor would not unduly endanger the life, limb, or health of the minor and if the employment meets the conditions of wages and hours prevailing for the majority of the employees in the industry at the time of employment, the commissioner may grant an exemption in writing from (a) of this section for a minor 16 — 18 years of age to work at those duties

outside school hours, or while on school vacation, if the minor is attending school; or

if the minor is no longer attending school.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, a person under 18 years of age who is scheduled to work for six consecutive hours or more is entitled to a break of at least 30 minutes during the course of the work shift. The break required by this subsection may be scheduled at the convenience of the employer but must occur after the first hour and a half of work and before the beginning of the last hour of work. A person under 18 years of age who works for five consecutive hours without a break is entitled to a break of at least 30 minutes before continuing to work. This subsection may be modified by the terms of a collective bargaining agreement that covers the employment of the person under 18. This subsection may be modified on occasion by mutual agreement between the employer and the employee.

Notwithstanding AS

23.10.055(a)(11)

, failure to provide the unpaid break periods required by (c) of this section creates a minimum wage liability under AS

23.10.065

for the break that the employee did not receive or received late. A claim for minimum wage in lieu of the unpaid break is enforceable under AS

23.10.110

.

The provisions of (c) of this section do not apply to

an individual employed in the catching, trapping, cultivating or farming, netting, or taking of any kind of fish, shellfish, or other aquatic forms of animal and vegetable life;

an individual employed by a member of the individual’s family; in this paragraph, “member of the individual’s family” means the individual’s spouse, parent, stepparent, grandparent, step-grandparent, great grandparent, step-great grandparent, brother, sister, uncle, aunt, great-uncle, or great-aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption or by marriage.

A minor under the age of 18 may not be employed or allowed to work in any capacity on the premises of a business that offers adult entertainment. In this subsection, “business that offers adult entertainment” means a business in which one or more individuals are employed or contracted to, wholly or in part, or permitted to entertain others by

removing clothes or other items that clothe or hide the person’s body;

dancing or in any other manner exhibiting the individual’s body in a completely or almost completely unclothed state;

participating in an actual or simulated illegal, indecent, or lewd exhibition, act, or practice including

sexual penetration;

the lewd exhibition or touching of a person’s genitals, anus, or breast; or

bestiality.

History.

(§§ 2, 3 ch 73 SLA 1949; § 4 ch 73 SLA 1949; am §§ 1, 2 ch 28 SLA 1951; am § 84 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 112 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, in subsection (d), “AS

23.10.055(a)(11)

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.055

(11)” to reflect the addition of AS

23.10.055

(b) and (c) by § 2, ch. 90, SLA 2005.

Administrative Code. —

For employment of minors 14 and 15 years of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 1.

For employment of minors under 18 years of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 2.

For certificates of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 23.10.355.
Employment of persons under 21.

A person under 21 may not be employed or allowed to sell or serve alcoholic beverages or to work on a licensed premises, except as provided in AS

04.16.049

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 1951; am § 24 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 112 SLA 1976; am § 58 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 17 ch 109 SLA 1983)

Legislative history reports. —

Chapter 245, SLA 1970 (HCSSB 399 am H), was identical to CSHB 406 (Jud.).
For report on CSHB 406 (Jud.), see 1970 House Journal Supplement No. 6.

Sec. 23.10.360.
Regulations for minimum standards and work opportunities.

The department may, from time to time after public notice and hearing, adopt regulations and issue orders establishing minimum standards for safety, working conditions, kind and extent of work in various phases of the respective fields of employment, maximum hours for the day and week, and minimum rates of pay, and other reasonable safeguards compatible with the welfare of all minors covered by AS

23.10.325

—

23.10.370

.

The department shall make cooperative arrangements with other state and federal agencies and shall adopt the regulations that are necessary to provide opportunities for work experience in safe and healthful occupations for minors.

The department shall, after notice and hearing, adopt regulations authorizing the employment of minors under 18 years of age and exempting appropriate employers from the requirement to secure the commissioner’s written authorization under AS

23.10.332(a)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 73 SLA 1949; am § 6 ch 112 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For employment of minors 14 and 15 years of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 1.

For employment of minors under 18 years of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 2.

For certificates of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 3.

For entertainment industry, see 8 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 23.10.365.
Enforcement.

The department shall enforce AS

23.10.325

—

23.10.370

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 73 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.10.370.
Penalty.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who violates a provision of AS

23.10.325

—

23.10.370

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or by both.

A person who employs a minor in violation of AS

23.10.350(f)

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a class C felony for the second and each subsequent offense.

History.

(§ 7 ch 73 SLA 1949; am §§ 4, 5 ch 18 SLA 1995)